Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3636.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 268 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 32C. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a sworn officer
of the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency, or a law enforcement agency
or law enforcement officer working in collaboration or under contract with United States
immigration and customs enforcement, shall not detain, delay, hold, or otherwise restrict the
freedom to travel of any parent or caregiver of minor child without first: (a) submitting a written
continuity of care plan for the minor child or children in the parent’s or caregiver’s custody to
the department of children and families, in a form and manner to be determined by the
department; and (b) receiving a written acknowledgement of receipt and approval of the written
continuity of care plan from the department.
of 1